Rhode Island statutes. Title 9 Courts and Civil Procedure — Procedure Generally
Chapter 23 Motion for New Trial [Repealed.]

9-23-1 — 9-23-5.
Repealed.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, §§ 485 to 489; G.L. 1909, ch. 298, §§ 12-16; P.L. 1909, ch. 436, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 348, §§ 12-16; G.L. 1938, ch. 540, §§ 1-5; G.L. 1956, §§

9-23-1

— 9-23-5; P.L. 1965, ch. 55, § 40; P.L. 1970, ch. 110, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 1972, ch. 169, § 9.